Utah statutes.
63G-3-702.   Utah Administrative Code -- Organization -- Official compilation.

(1)  The Utah Administrative Code shall be divided into three parts:

(a)  titles, whose number shall begin with "R";

(b)  rules; and

(c)  sections.

(2)  All sections contained in the code are referenced by a three-part number indicating its location in the code.

(3)  The division shall maintain the official compilation of the code and is the state-designated repository for administrative rules.  If a dispute arises in which there is more than one version of a rule, the latest effective version on file with the division is considered the correct, current version.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

